Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-149
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 43-147 to 43-154, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Adoption assistance state shall mean the state that is signatory to an adoption assistance agreement in a particular case;

(2) Department shall mean the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(3) State shall mean a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam, the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, or a territory or possession of or administered by the United States.

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 121.